Maryland, session 2025, SB0576.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
3–718.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0576*

SENATE BILL 576
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “POLITICAL MATTERS” MEANS MATTERS RELATING TO:
(I) ELECTIONS FOR POLITICAL OFFICE;
(II) POLITICAL PARTIES;
(III) PROPOSALS TO CHANGE:
1. LEGISLATION;
2. REGULATIONS; OR
3. PUBLIC POLICY; OR
(IV) THE DECISION TO JOIN OR SUPPORT A POLITICAL PARTY OR
POTENTIAL CIVIC, COMMUNITY, FRATERNAL, OR LABOR ORGANIZATION.
(3) “RELIGIOUS MATTERS” MEANS MATTERS RELATING TO
RELIGIOUS BELIEF, AFFILIATION, AND PRACTICE OR THE DECISION TO JOIN OR
SUPPORT A RELIGIOUS ENTITY.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN EMPLOYER THAT IS A RELIGIOUS
CORPORATION, ORGANIZATION, OR ASSOCIATION, OR AN EDUCATIONAL
INSTITUTION OR SOCIETY THAT IS EXEMPT FROM THE REQUIREMENTS OF TITLE VII
OF THE CIVIL RIGHTS ACT OF 1964 UNDER 42 U.S.C. § 2000E–1(A).
(C) AN EMPLOYER MAY NOT:
(1) DISCHARGE, DISCIPLINE, OR OTHERWISE PENALIZE OR
THREATEN TO DISCHARGE, DISCIPLINE, OR OTHERWISE PENALIZE AN EMPLOYEE
BECAUSE THE EMPLOYEE DECLINES TO ATTEND OR PARTICIPATE IN AN
EMPLOYER–SPONSORED MEETING DURING WHICH THE EMPLOYER COMMUNICATES
THE OPINION OF THE EMPLOYER REGARDING RELIGIOUS MATTERS OR POLITICAL
MATTERS; OR
(2) FAIL OR REFUSE TO HIRE AN APPLICANT FOR EMPLOYMENT AS A
RESULT OF THE APPLICANT’S REFUSAL TO ATTEND OR PARTICIPATE IN AN
EMPLOYER–SPONSORED MEETING DURING WHICH THE EMPLOYER COMMUNICATES
THE OPINION OF THE EMPLOYER REGARDING RELIGIOUS MATTERS OR POLITICAL
MATTERS.

SENATE BILL 576 3
(D) THIS SECTION DOES NOT PROHIBIT AN EMPLOYER FROM:
(1) COMMUNICATING INFORMATION THAT THE EMPLOYER IS
REQUIRED BY LAW TO COMMUNICATE; OR
(2) CONDUCTING A MEETING THAT INVOLVES RELIGIOUS MATTERS
OR POLITICAL MATTERS IF ATTENDANCE AND PARTICIPATION ARE VOLUNTARY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.